Utah statutes.
7-2-21 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Applicability of Utah Procurement Code.

No action of the commissioner taken under this chapter or Chapter 19 is subject to the provisions of Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code.

